apertium-bak.bak.lexc
LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!

!==============================================================================!
!                                 CLITICS
!==============================================================================!


LEXICON CLIT-EMPH-SANA

%+һана%<emph%>:%>һ%{A%}н%{A%} # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-EMPH-CHI

%+cы%<emph%>:%>с%{I%} # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-EMPH

CLIT-EMPH-SANA ; ! ""
CLIT-EMPH-CHI ; ! ""

LEXICON CLIT-QST

%+мы%<qst%>:%>м%{I%} # ; ! ""
%+мы% ни%<qst%>:%>м%{I%}% ни # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODASS

%+ла%<mod_ass%>:%>%{L%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+лаһа%<mod_ass%>:%>%{L%}аһа # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODIND

%+лыр%<mod_ind%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}р # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA

%+гына%<postadv%>:% %{G%}%{I%}н%{A%} # ; ! ""

LEXICON CLIT-DA-CNJ

%+да%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA-ETC

CLIT-GHANA ;
CLIT-DA-CNJ ;
%+да%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+уҡ%<postadv%>:% %{U%}%{K%} # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COP

%+и%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-S1-COP ;

LEXICON CLITICS-NO-COP

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-MODIND ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCL-COP 

CLITICS-NO-COP ;
CLIT-COP ;

LEXICON CLITICS-AFTER-IMP-SG

CLIT-EMPH ;
CLIT-GHANA ;
CLIT-DA-CNJ ;

LEXICON CLITICS-AFTER-IMP-PL

CLIT-EMPH-CHI ;
CLIT-GHANA ;
CLIT-DA-CNJ ;

!==============================================================================!
!                            NOMINAL INFLECTION
! This section contains everyhing needed to describe inflection of nominals.
! It starts with the LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{N%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{L%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>: POSSESSIVES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;

%<attr%>: GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
%<loc%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й POSSESSIVES ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й CASES ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й PLURAL ;
%<equ%>:%>с%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON CASES-POSSESSIVES

%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<abl%>:%>%{N%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й POSSESSIVES ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й CASES ;
%<sim%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}й PLURAL ;
%<equ%>:%>с%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX1-2-SG

CASES-POSSESSIVES ;
%<dat%>:%>%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{L%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX3-SG

CASES-POSSESSIVES ;
%<dat%>:%>н%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>нд%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<loc%>:%>нд%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX1-2-SG ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX1-2-SG ;
!%<px3sp%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX3-SG ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{h%}%{I%} CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX3-SG ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}ҙ CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CASES-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+hыҙ%<post%>:%>h%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LI-POSTPOSITION

%+лы%<post%>:%>л%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
LI-POSTPOSITION ;

!==============================================================================!
!                 ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION
!
! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! e.g. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of COMPARATIVE continuation class
!==============================================================================!

!LEXICON COMPARATIVE
!
!%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
!CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON A2                

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON A4                 

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ;

!==============================================================================!
!                            VERBAL INFLECTION
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO1SG

%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>һ%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>һ%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>һ%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>һ%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

V-PERS-S1-NO1SG ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-COP

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>һ%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>б%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>һ%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>h%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>h%{I%}%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -NI-<ifi>, -һA-<prc_cond>, -һA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%> CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}ҙ CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{G%}%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON V-PERS-PRESENT

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<pres>

V-PERS-S1-NO1SG ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/LR

 LEXICON Adjectives
агротехник:агротехник A4 ; ! ""
айырылғыһыҙ:айырылғыһыҙ A4 ; ! ""
аналитик:аналитик A4 ; ! ""
аралаш:аралаш A4 ; ! ""
археологик:археологик A4 ; ! ""
атлы:атлы A4 ; ! ""
биологик:биологик A4 ; ! ""
бөтә% донъя:бөтә% донъя A4 ; ! ""
генераль:генераль A4 ; ! ""
геологик:геологик A4 ; ! ""
героик:героик A4 ; ! ""
гравитацион:гравитацион A4 ; ! ""
гуманитар:гуманитар A4 ; ! ""
демографик:демографик A4 ; ! ""
диэлектрик:диэлектрик A4 ; ! ""
дөйөм% милли:дөйөм% милли A4 ; ! ""
иҡтисади:иҡтисади A4 ; ! ""
инженерлыҡ:инженерлыҡ A4 ; ! ""
интенсив:интенсив A4 ; ! ""
йүгерек:йүгерек A4 ; ! ""
классик:классик A4 ; ! ""
коммерциаль:коммерциаль A4 ; ! ""
корпоратив:корпоратив A4 ; ! ""
күмәк:күмәк A4 ; ! ""
ҡайғылы:ҡайғылы A4 ; ! ""
лингвистик:лингвистик A4 ; ! ""
мемориаль:мемориаль A4 ; ! ""
мораль:мораль A4 ; ! ""
мәңгелек:мәңгелек A4 ; ! ""
өйлө:өйлө A4 ; ! ""
практик:практик A4 ; ! ""
радиолокацион:радиолокацион A4 ; ! ""
рәтле:рәтле A4 ; ! ""
синтетик:синтетик A4 ; ! ""
статистик:статистик A4 ; ! ""
таҙа:таҙа A4 ; ! ""
террористик:террористик A4 ; ! ""
трагик:трагик A4 ; ! ""
фашистик:фашистик A4 ; ! ""
хайран:хайран A4 ; ! ""
шартлатҡыс:шартлатҡыс A4 ; ! ""
электронлы:электронлы A4 ; ! ""
этнографик:этнографик A4 ; ! ""
ап%-аҡ:ап%-аҡ A3 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! ""
асыулы:асыулы A3 ; ! ""
атаҡлы:атаҡлы A3 ; ! ""
бар:бар A3 ; ! ""
башланғыс:башланғыс A3 ; ! ""
берҙәм:берҙәм A3 ; ! ""
бәйле:бәйле A3 ; ! ""
бәйләнешле:бәйләнешле A3 ; ! ""
йылғы:йылғы A3 ; ! ""
йыллыҡ:йыллыҡ A3 ; ! ""
йәйге:йәйге A3 ; ! ""
йәшлек:йәшлек A3 ; ! ""
киләһе:киләһе A3 ; ! ""
күренекле:күренекле A3 ; ! ""
күсмә:күсмә A3 ; ! ""
кәбисә:кәбисә A3 ; ! ""
ҡуш:ҡуш A3 ; ! ""
мөмкин:мөмкин A3 ; ! ""
мәжбүр:мәжбүр A3 ; ! ""
өҫтәмә:өҫтәмә A3 ; ! ""
рухани:рухани%{ъ%} A3 ; ! ""
рәсми:рәсми A3 ; ! ""
сиктәш:сиктәш A3 ; ! ""
таулы:таулы A3 ; ! ""
тейеш:тейеш A3 ; ! ""
тоғро:тоғро A3 ; ! ""
тоташ:тоташ A3 ; ! ""
төп:төп A3 ; ! ""
традицион:традицион A3 ; ! ""
тураһындағы:тураһындағы A3 ; ! ""
федераль:федераль A3 ; ! ""
һөнәри:һөнәри A3 ; ! ""
ысын:ысын A3 ; ! ""
эшлекле:эшлекле A3 ; ! ""
әлеге:әлеге A3 ; ! ""
ябыҡ:ябыҡ A3 ; ! ""
ас:ас A2 ; ! ""
ашығыс:ашығыс A2 ; ! ""
билдәле:билдәле A2 ; ! ""
бәйһеҙ:бәйһеҙ A2 ; ! ""
ғәйепле:ғәйепле A2 ; ! ""
еүеш:еүеш A2 ; ! ""
йыуаш:йыуаш A2 ; ! ""
күптәнге:күптәнге A2 ; ! ""
ҡатлаулы:ҡатлаулы A2 ; ! ""
ҡөҙрәтле:ҡөҙрәтле A2 ; ! ""
ҡырағай:ҡырағай A2 ; ! ""
лайыҡ:лайыҡ A2 ; ! ""
мөһим:мөһим A2 ; ! ""
ныҡ:ныҡ A2 ; ! ""
өмөтлө:өмөтлө A2 ; ! ""
өҫтөн:өҫтөн A2 ; ! ""
тантаналы:тантаналы A2 ; ! ""
тейешле:тейешле A2 ; ! ""
тоҙло:тоҙло A2 ; ! ""
туҡлыҡлы:туҡлыҡлы A2 ; ! ""
түңәрәк:түңәрәк A2 ; ! ""
уңдырышлы:уңдырышлы A2 ; ! ""
үҙ% һүҙле:үҙ% һүҙле A2 ; ! ""
һаҙамыҡ:һаҙамыҡ A2 ; ! ""
шат:шат A2 ; ! ""
эйәһеҙ:эйәһеҙ A2 ; ! ""
әһәмиәтле:әһәмиәтле A2 ; ! ""
ябай:ябай A2 ; ! ""
абруйлы:абруйлы A2 ; ! ""
аҙаҡҡы:аҙаҡҡы A3 ; ! ""
актуаль:актуаль A2 ; ! ""
аҡ:аҡ A2 ; ! ""
ал:ал A2 ; ! ""
аллы:аллы A2 ; ! ""
алһыу:алһыу A2 ; ! ""
артабанғы:артабанғы A3 ; ! ""
арыҡ:арыҡ A2 ; ! ""
ауырыу:ауырыу A2 ; ! ""
аяҙлы:аяҙлы A2 ; ! ""
башҡарма:башҡарма A3 ; ! ""
бейек:бейек A1 ; ! ""
бер% төрлө:бер% төрлө A2 ; ! ""
берҙән%-бер:берҙән%-бер A3 ; ! ""
бикле:бикле A4 ; ! ""
бисара:бисара A2 ; ! ""
борсоулы:борсоулы A2 ; ! ""
бурыслы:бурыслы A2 ; ! ""
дөйөм:дөйөм A2 ; ! ""
дюймлы:дюймлы A1 ; ! ""
енәйәтсел:енәйәтсел A4 ; ! ""
заманса:заманса A2 ; ! ""
зәңгәр:зәңгәр A3 ; ! ""
ижтимағи:ижтимағи A3 ; ! ""
ирекле:ирекле A2 ; ! ""
йыйылма:йыйылма A3 ; ! ""
камаринский:камаринский A1 ; ! ""
ҡатлы%-ҡатлы:ҡатлы%-ҡатлы A1 ; ! ""
мәкле:мәкле A1 ; ! ""
рессор:рессор A1 ; ! ""
таныш:таныш A1 ; ! ""
тәртипле:тәртипле A1 ; ! ""
экспрессив:экспрессив A1 ; ! ""
яуаплы:яуаплы A2 ; ! ""
уңай:уңай A1 ; ! ""
мөғжизәле:мөғжизәле A1 ; ! ""
көмбәҙле:көмбәҙле A1 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Verbs
юҡ:юҡ A3 ; ! ""
абруйлы:абруйлы A1 ; ! ""
ап%-арыу:ап%-арыу A1 ; ! ""
баҫымсаҡ:баҫымсаҡ A1 ; ! ""
бөгөлөүсән:бөгөлөүсән A1 ; ! ""
бәйләнсек:бәйләнсек A1 ; ! ""
глицеринлы:глицеринлы A1 ; ! ""
дастуй:дастуй A1 ; ! ""
еңелерлек:еңелерлек A1 ; ! ""
иләмһеҙ:иләмһеҙ A1 ; ! ""
йомоштоҡһоҙ:йомоштоҡһоҙ A1 ; ! ""
йәнһеҙ:йәнһеҙ A1 ; ! ""
колонналы:колонналы A1 ; ! ""
кристаллик:кристаллик A1 ; ! ""
ҡабыҡлы:ҡабыҡлы A1 ; ! ""
ҡатлы%-ҡатлы:ҡатлы%-ҡатлы A1 ; ! ""
ҡурҡынысһыҙ:ҡурҡынысһыҙ A1 ; ! ""
ҡыҫмыр:ҡыҫмыр A1 ; ! ""
марштағы:марштағы A1 ; ! ""
мөфассәл:мөфассәл A1 ; ! ""
натураль:натураль A1 ; ! ""
оятлы:оятлы A1 ; ! ""
пролетар:пролетар A1 ; ! ""
сейсмографик:сейсмографик A1 ; ! ""
суҡыраҡ:суҡыраҡ A1 ; ! ""
тапалтаҡ:тапалтаҡ A1 ; ! ""
толҡалы:толҡалы A1 ; ! ""
түбәләм:түбәләм A1 ; ! ""
уйынҡы:уйынҡы A1 ; ! ""
фәҡир:фәҡир A1 ; ! ""
һармаҡ:һармаҡ A1 ; ! ""
һырғаҡ:һырғаҡ A1 ; ! ""
шыйҙаҡ:шыйҙаҡ A1 ; ! ""
электрик:электрик A1 ; ! ""
әһендәй:әһендәй A1 ; ! ""
